Utah statutes.
56-1-15.   Fire caused by railroad operations.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Railroad operation" means an operation conducted:
(i)  by a railroad:
(A)  owner;
(B)  operator;
(C)  contractor; or
(D)  lessee; and
(ii)  on a rail line.
(b)  "Railroad operation" includes an operation of a train, a construction
operation, or a maintenance operation.
(2)  In an action for damages that result from a fire caused by a railroad
operation, proof that the fire occurred and was caused by a railroad operation
is prima facie evidence of negligence on the part of the person who conducted
the railroad operation.
